Hawaii statutes.
[§527‑2] Definitions. As used in
this chapter:

"Beneficiary" means a person that
receives property under a transfer on death deed.

"Designated beneficiary" means a
person designated in a transfer on death deed to receive property.

"Joint owner" means an individual who
owns property concurrently with one or more individuals with a right of
survivorship. The term includes a joint tenant and a tenant by the entirety
but does not include a tenant in common.

"Person" means an individual,
corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability
company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or
governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or
commercial entity.

"Property" means an interest in real
property located in this State that is transferable on the death of the owner.

"Subject property" means real
property or an interest in real property that is subject to a transfer on death
deed.

"Transfer on death deed" means a deed
authorized under this chapter.

"Transferor" means an individual who
executes a transfer on death deed. [L 2011, c 173, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next